Utah statutes.
57-13b-201.   Prescriptive easement for livestock trail.
(1)  A prescriptive easement may be established if:
(a)  a property owner uses an historical livestock trail that crosses another
person's property for a period of 20 years; and
(b)  the use of the other owner's property as an historical livestock trail
for the 20-year period described in Subsection (1)(a) is:
(i)  continuous;
(ii)  open and notorious; and
(iii)  adverse.
(2)  If a property owner establishes that a use is continuous and open and
notorious under Subsections (1)(b)(i) and (ii), there is a rebuttable
presumption that the use is adverse.
(3)  Notwithstanding Subsections (1) and (2), a prescriptive easement under
this chapter may only be established on private lands.
